Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.310 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 15.310 to 15.510, 15.990, and 15.992, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Agency" means any law enforcement agency or other unit of government listed
in KRS 15.380 that employs a certified peace officer or certified court security
officer;
(2) "Basic training course" means the peace officer or court security officer basic
training course provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a course
approved and recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council;
(3)[(2)] "Certified court security officer" means a court security officer who is
certified under KRS 15.380 to 15.404;
(4)[(3)] "Certified peace officer" means a peace officer who is certified under KRS
15.380 to 15.404;
(5)[(4)] "Certification" means the act by the council of issuing certification to a peace
officer or court security officer who successfully completes the training
requirements pursuant to KRS 15.404 and the requirements set forth within this
chapter;
(6)[(5)] "Council" means the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council established by KRS
15.310 to 15.510, 15.990, and 15.992;
(7) "Court order" means any judgment, decree, or order restraining a person from
possessing a firearm that was issued by a federal court or a court in the
Commonwealth or any other state after a hearing where the person received
actual notice of the hearing and was afforded the opportunity to participate;
(8)[(6)] "Court security officer" means a person required to be certified under KRS
15.380(1)(c) and who is charged with the duties set out in KRS 70.280;
Page 1 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
(9)[(7)] "Department" means the Department of Criminal Justice Training of the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(10)[(8)] "Fire investigator" means a professional firefighter, as used in KRS 95A.210,
who has been appointed to investigate offenses under KRS Chapter 513 and to
exercise peace officer powers under KRS 95A.100, or a deputy fire marshal who
has been appointed to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers
under KRS 227.220;
(11)[(9)] "Law enforcement officer" means a member of a lawfully organized police
unit or police force of a county, city or metropolitan government who is responsible
for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the
state, as well as sheriffs, sworn deputy sheriffs, campus police officers, law
enforcement support personnel, public airport authority security officers, and other
public and federal peace officers responsible for law enforcement;
(12)[(10)] "Peace officer" means a person defined in KRS 446.010, or a fire investigator
appointed to exercise peace officer powers under KRS 95A.100 or 227.220;
(13)[(11)] "Secretary" means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and
(14)[(12)] "Validated job task analysis" means the minimum entry level qualifications
and training requirements for peace officers in the Commonwealth based upon an
actual survey and study of police officer duties and responsibilities conducted by an
entity recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council as being competent to
conduct such a study.
Section 2. KRS 15.382 is amended to read as follows:
Prior to being hired, any[A] person seeking to become certified after December 1, 1998,
under KRS 15.380 to 15.404 or qualified under the requirements set forth in KRS
15.440(1)(d)6. shall[, at the time of becoming certified,] meet the following minimum
qualifications:
(1) Be a citizen of the United States;
Page 2 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
(2) Except as provided under KRS 15.408, be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(3) (a) Be a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or
certified by a governing body, provided that the education received met the
attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky law at the time of
graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or
(b) Possess a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(4) Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;
(5) Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;
(6) Not have:
(a) Been convicted of:
1. Any felony;
2. A misdemeanor under KRS 510.120, 510.130, or 510.140;
3. A second or subsequent offense under KRS 510.148; or
4. A criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit
any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct; or
(b) [have ]Had any offense listed under this subsection expunged;
(7) Not be prohibited by a court order or any federal or state law from possessing a
firearm;
(8) Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as
established by the council;
(9) Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general
discharge under other than honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of
the Armed Forces of the United States;
(10) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, have passed a
medical examination as defined by the council by administrative regulation
and provided by a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced
practice registered nurse to determine if he or she can perform peace officer
Page 3 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
duties as determined by a validated job task analysis.
(b) [However, ]If the employing agency has its own council-approved validated
job task analysis, the person shall pass the medical examination, appropriate
to the agency's job task analysis, of the employing agency. All agencies shall
certify passing medical examination results to the council, which shall accept
them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(11) (a) Have passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the council by
administrative regulation.
(b) A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug screening test if the results of
the test are negative for the use of an illegal controlled substance or
prescription drug abuse.
(c) Any agency that administers its own test that meets or exceeds this standard
shall certify passing test results to the council, which shall accept them as
complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(12) (a) Have undergone a background investigation established or approved by the
council by administrative regulation to determine suitability for the position of
a peace officer.
(b) If the employing agency has established its own background investigation that
meets or exceeds the standards of the council, as set forth by administrative
regulation, the agency shall conduct the background investigation and shall
certify background investigation results to the council, which shall accept
them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(13) Have been interviewed by the employing agency;
(14) Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in the
Commonwealth or another state;
(15) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, have taken a
psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the council
Page 4 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
by administrative regulation to determine the person's suitability to perform
peace officer duties as determined by a council validated job task analysis.
(b) [However, ]If the employing agency has its own council-approved validated
job task analysis, the person shall take that agency's psychological suitability
screening, appropriate to the agency's job task analysis. All agencies shall
certify psychological suitability screening results to the council, which shall
accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(16) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, have passed
a physical agility test administered or approved by the council by
administrative regulation to determine his or her suitability to perform
peace officer duties as determined by a council validated job task
analysis.
2. [However, ]If the employing agency has its own council-approved
validated job task analysis, the person shall take the physical agility test
of the employing agency. All agencies shall certify physical agility test
results to the council, which shall accept them as demonstrating
compliance with KRS 15.310 to 15.510.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person shall not be
required to pass a physical agility test if the person can provide certified
documentation that at the time of his or her application to the employing
agency, the person:
1. Is currently employed, or has been separated from service for less than
three (3) months, as a certified peace[law enforcement] officer in
another state;
2. Is currently in good standing, or separated from service in good
standing, with the other state or law enforcement agency where he or
she is certified;
Page 5 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
3. Has been continuously employed as a full-time certified peace[law
enforcement] officer in the state where he or she is certified for at least
ten (10) years prior to his or her application; and
4. Has passed a physical agility test as a condition of employment with the
law enforcement agency in the other state where he or she is certified;
and
(17) (a) Have taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the council
by administrative regulation to determine his or her suitability to perform
peace officer duties.
(b) Any agency that administers its own polygraph examination as approved by
the council shall certify the results that indicate whether a person is suitable
for employment as a peace officer to the council, which shall accept them as
complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510.
Section 3. KRS 15.391 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agency" means any law enforcement agency, or other unit of government
listed in KRS 15.380, that employs a certified peace officer;
(b) "Final order" has the same meaning as in KRS 13B.010 and shall be specific
to whether the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council has met the requirements
under this section to revoke an individual's peace officer certification;
(c) "General employment policy" means a rule, regulation, policy, or procedure
commonly applicable to the general workforce or civilian employees that is
not unique to law enforcement activities or the exercise of peace officer
authority, regardless of whether the rule, regulation, policy, or procedure
exists or appears in a manual or handbook that is solely applicable to a law
enforcement department or agency within the unit of government employing
the officer;
Page 6 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
(d) "Investigating agency" means an agency that investigates the use of force, a
criminal act, or an administrative violation by peace officers, including but
not limited to the employing agency;
(e) "Professional malfeasance" means engaging in an act in one's professional
capacity as a peace officer that violates a federal, state, or local law or
regulation, or any act that involves the following:
1. The unjustified use of excessive or deadly force, as determined by an
investigating agency;
2. Any intentional action by a peace officer that interferes with or alters the
fair administration of justice, including but not limited to tampering with
evidence, giving of false testimony, or the intentional disclosure of
confidential information in a manner that compromises the integrity of
an official investigation; or
3. Engaging in a sexual relationship with an individual the peace officer
knows or should have known is a victim, witness, defendant, or
informant in an ongoing criminal investigation in which the peace
officer is directly involved;
(f) "Professional nonfeasance" means a failure to perform one's professional duty
as a peace officer through omission or inaction that violates a federal, state, or
local law or regulation, or any failure to act that involves the following:
1. The failure to intervene when it is safe and practical to do so in any
circumstance where it is clear and apparent to the peace officer that
another peace officer is engaging in the use of unlawful and unjustified
excessive or deadly force; or
2. The intentional failure to disclose exculpatory or impeachment evidence
that the peace officer knew or should have known to be materially
favorable to an accused for the purpose of altering the fair
Page 7 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
administration of justice; and
(g) "Regulation" means:
1. A federal or state administrative regulation adopted by a federal or state
executive branch; and
2. A local rule, regulation, policy, or procedure adopted by ordinance,
order, or resolution, or other official action by an agency. However,
"regulation" does not mean a general employment policy.
(2) (a) The certification of a peace officer shall be deemed automatically revoked by
the council by operation of the law for one (1) or more of the following:
1. Certification that was the result of an administrative error;
2. Plea of guilty to, conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to:
a. Any state or federal felony;
b. A misdemeanor under KRS 510.120, 510.130, or 510.140; a
second or subsequent offense under KRS 510.148; or a criminal
attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any
degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct;
c. Any criminal offense committed in another state that would
constitute a felony if committed in this state; or
d. Any criminal offense committed in another state that would, if
committed in this state, constitute a misdemeanor under KRS
510.120, 510.130, or 510.140; a second or subsequent offense
under KRS 510.148; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation,
or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual
abuse, or sexual misconduct;
3. Prohibition by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;
4. Receipt of a dishonorable discharge or bad conduct discharge from any
branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; or
Page 8 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
5. Willful falsification of information to obtain or maintain certification.
(b) 1. A peace officer whose certification is revoked pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection may file an appeal at any time with the council. If an
appeal is filed, the council shall conduct an administrative hearing
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B to consider the reinstatement of the peace
officer's certification if the revocation was made in error or the condition
requiring revocation was removed or remedied.
2. The council may impose any reasonable condition upon the
reinstatement of the certification it may deem warranted under the facts
of the appeal.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the council may subpoena
or request a court to subpoena records that are necessary to provide
evidence that will permit the council to evaluate the conditions of
separation. Any confidential, active investigation, or medical
information received by the council under this subparagraph shall retain
its confidential character.
4. The reversal or any other type of invalidation of a conviction by an
appellate court shall constitute the removal or remedy of a condition
requiring revocation. However, an expungement of an offense shall not
be considered a removal or remedy that constitutes grounds for the
reinstatement of the peace officer's certification under this paragraph.
5. A final order issued by the council denying reinstatement of certification
may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 13B.140.
(3) (a) The certification of a peace officer may be revoked by the council for one (1)
or more of the following:
1. Termination of the peace officer for failure to meet or maintain training
requirements, unless the certification is in inactive status. As used in this
Page 9 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
subparagraph, "inactive status" has the same meaning as in KRS 15.386;
2. Termination of the peace officer for professional malfeasance or
professional nonfeasance by his or her agency;
3. Termination of the peace officer following the plea of guilty to,
conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to any misdemeanor offense,
in this state or out of it, that involves:
a. Dishonesty;
b. Fraud;
c. Deceit;
d. Misrepresentation;
e. Physical violence;
f. Sexual abuse; or
g. Crimes against a minor or a family or household member;
4. Receipt of general discharge under other than honorable conditions from
any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States that results in the
termination of the peace officer from his or her agency;[ or]
5. Resignation or retirement of the peace officer while he or she is under
criminal investigation or administrative investigation for professional
malfeasance or professional nonfeasance that, in the judgment of the
agency that employed the peace officer, would have likely resulted in
the termination of that peace officer had the facts leading to the
investigation been substantiated prior to his or her resignation or
retirement; or
6. Resignation or retirement of the peace officer and subsequent
discovery of conduct that, in the judgment of the agency that employed
the peace officer, would constitute professional malfeasance or
professional nonfeasance that would have likely resulted in the
Page 10 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
termination of that peace officer had the facts been discovered prior to
his or her resignation or retirement.
(b) The council shall review reports of events described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection to determine whether the event warrants the initiation of
proceedings by the council to revoke a peace officer's certification. If the
council determines to initiate proceedings to revoke a peace officer's
certification under this subsection, the administrative hearing shall be
conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B. A final order by the council
revoking certification may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of KRS
13B.140.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the council may subpoena or
request a court to subpoena records that are necessary to provide evidence that
will permit the council to evaluate the conditions of separation. Any
confidential, active investigation, or medical information received by the
council under this paragraph shall retain its confidential character.
(4) (a) An agency:
1. That has knowledge of a peace officer in its employment who meets any
of the revocation conditions outlined in subsection (2) of this section
shall report that condition to the council within fifteen (15) days of
gaining knowledge;
2. That terminated a peace officer for any of the revocation conditions
outlined in subsection (3)(a)1., 2., 3., or 4. of this section shall report
that condition to the council within fifteen (15) days of the termination;
and
3. That would have likely terminated a peace officer for the revocation
condition outlined in:
a. Subsection (3)(a)5. of this section shall report that condition to the
Page 11 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
council within fifteen (15) days of the peace officer's resignation
or retirement; or
b. Subsection (3)(a)6. of this section shall report that condition to
the council within fifteen (15) days of the discovery of the
condition.
If an agency reports pursuant to this subparagraph, the agency shall
notify the peace officer that a report has been made.
(b) If an agency fails to make a report required by this subsection, the council
may suspend the agency from participation in the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Foundation Program fund. However, the time that an agency may be
suspended by the council under this paragraph shall not exceed five (5) years.
(5) The council may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Section 4. KRS 15.3975 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A court security officer employed or appointed after June 26, 2007, shall satisfy the
basic training requirements for employment if he or she successfully completes law
enforcement training developed and approved by the [Kentucky Law Enforcement
]council and the Administrative Office of the Courts of at least eighty (80) hours.
(2) A court security officer employed or appointed after June 26, 2007, shall
successfully complete forty (40) hours of biennial in-service training that has been
certified or recognized by the [Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council, and that is
appropriate to the officer's responsibilities.
(3) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of a certified court
security officer that prevent the officer from completing the basic or in-service
training within the time specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
executive director of the council[commissioner of the department] or his or her
designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred
Page 12 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
eighty (180) days in which to complete the training.
(4) (a) Any court security officer who fails to successfully complete basic training
within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her
court security powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse.
(b) Any court security officer who fails to successfully complete in-service
training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his
or her court security powers and his or her certification status shall be
changed to training deficiency status. When a court security officer is
deficient in required training, the executive director of the
council[commissioner of the department] or his or her designee shall notify
[the council, which shall notify ]the court security officer and his or her
agency.
(5) A certified court security officer who has lost his or her court security powers due
solely to his or her failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this
section may regain his or her certification status and court security powers upon
successful completion of the training deficiency.
Section 5. KRS 15.404 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any peace officers employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, who have
not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized
by the [Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council, shall within one (1) year of their
appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course, as
established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by the
[Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council or receive a basic training credit
approved by the [Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council under KRS
15.440(1)(d)6.
(b) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing basic training within one (1) year, the
Page 13 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
executive director of the council[commissioner of the department] or his or
her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one
hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training.
(c) Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the
specified time periods, including extensions, shall:
1. Lose his or her law enforcement powers and his or her precertification
status shall lapse; and[. Further, the peace officer shall]
2. Be prohibited from serving as a peace officer for a period of one (1) year
from the date that his or her precertification lapses.
(2) (a) All peace officers with active certification status shall successfully complete
forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or
recognized by the [Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council[, that is appropriate
to the officer's rank and responsibility and the size and location of his
department].
(b) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1)
year, the executive director of the council[commissioner of the department]
or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to
exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training. If
the officer is unable to complete the in-service training due to injury or illness
that prevents him or her from working as a peace officer, the one hundred
eighty (180) day extension shall begin on the date that the officer returns to
work.
(c) Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training
within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her
law enforcement powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to
training deficiency status.
Page 14 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
(d) When a peace officer is deficient in required training, the executive director
of the council[commissioner of the department] or his or her designee [shall
notify the council, which ]shall notify the peace officer and his or her agency.
(e) The requirements of this subsection shall be waived for the period of time that
a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces.
(f) This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of September
11, 2001.
(3) An officer who has lost his or her law enforcement powers due solely to his or her
failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or
her certification status and law enforcement powers upon successful completion of
the training deficiency.
(4) (a) Any constable who is elected may apply for admission to a basic training
course, as established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by
the [Kentucky Law Enforcement ]council. The constable shall:
1. Meet all precertification requirements established pursuant to KRS
15.382 for attendance; and[. The constable shall]
2. Bear all costs associated with:
a. Precertification; and[. The constable shall bear all costs associated
with]
b. Completion of the basic training course, except the costs of a basic
training course provided under[at a course established pursuant
to] KRS 15.340(5).
(b) The basic training course shall accept the constable for basic training so long
as:
1. The constable meets the precertification requirements; and
2. The basic training course has the training capacity to instruct the
constable.
Page 15 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
Section 6. KRS 15.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [As used in this section, "agency" means any law enforcement agency, or other unit
of government listed in KRS 15.380, that employs a certified peace officer.
(2) ](a) Subject to subsection (4)[(5)] of this section, any agency may make a
conditional offer of employment to a candidate pending its receipt and
evaluation of a response to its request for information from:
1.[(a)] The council regarding the certification status of any candidate,
including if the council has:
a.[1.] Received any notification under subsection KRS 15.391(4) related
to the candidate;
b.[2.] Initiated hearing procedures under KRS 15.391 against the
candidate; or
c.[3.] Started investigating whether to initiate hearing procedures for the
revocation of the certification of the candidate under KRS 15.391;
or
2.[(b)] Any agency that previously employed the candidate for any
information the agency is required to provide under subsection (2)[(3)]
of this section.
(b) An agency shall request the information described under paragraph (a) of
this subsection prior to making a conditional offer of employment.
(2)[(3)] Any agency that receives an inquiry under subsection (1)[(2)] of this section
from another agency regarding a candidate for a peace officer position who was
formerly employed by the agency shall provide the following documentation to the
hiring agency:
(a) A complete copy of the peace officer's personnel file;
(b) Any documentation related to the arrest or prosecution of the peace officer
that the agency maintained;
Page 16 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 541/GA
(c) Any documentation related to a completed internal administrative
investigation of the peace officer; and
(d) Any documentation related to an incomplete internal administrative
investigation of the peace officer that was not completed because of the
officer's resignation or retirement while the investigation was pending.
(3)[(4)] The council and any agency that receives a request for information shall
provide it to the requesting hiring agency no later than fourteen (14) days following
the receipt of the request.
(4)[(5)] The hiring agency that elects to make a conditional offer of employment
subject to its receipt and evaluation of information pursuant to this section shall
require the candidate to complete a waiver and release of liability authorizing the
hiring agency to request the information from all prior agencies, which may include
employing agencies outside of the Commonwealth.
(5)[(6)] The council, any agency, and the employees and officers of the council or any
agency shall be immune from any civil liability for disclosing information pursuant
to the provisions of this section and from any civil liability for the consequences of
such a disclosure unless the information disclosed was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading, was rendered with malicious purpose, or was in violation
of any civil right of the former employee.
Section 7. KRS 15.992 is amended to read as follows:
Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS 15.350 to 15.370 or
Section 6 of this Act shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Page 17 of 17
HB054110.100 - 1791 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:25 PM GA